Washington statutes.
RCW 35.13.090

Election method—Vote required—Proposition for assumption of indebtedness—Certification.

(1) The proposition for or against annexation or for or against annexation and adoption of the comprehensive plan shall be deemed approved if a majority of the votes cast on that proposition are cast in favor of annexation or in favor of annexation and adoption of the comprehensive plan.

(2) If a proposition for or against assumption of all or any portion of indebtedness was submitted to the registered voters, it shall be deemed approved if a majority of at least three-fifths of the registered voters of the territory proposed to be annexed voting on such proposition vote in favor thereof, and the number of registered voters voting on such proposition constitutes not less than forty percent of the total number of votes cast in such territory at the last preceding general election.

(3) If either or both propositions were approved by the registered voters, the county auditor shall on completion of the canvassing of the returns transmit to the county legislative authority and to the clerk of the city or town to which annexation is proposed a certificate of the election results, together with a certified abstract of the vote showing the whole number who voted at the election, and the number of votes cast for annexation and the number cast against annexation or for annexation and adoption of the comprehensive plan and the number cast against annexation and adoption of the comprehensive plan.

(4) If a proposition for assumption of all or of any portion of indebtedness was submitted to the registered voters, the abstract shall include the number of votes cast for assumption of indebtedness and the number of votes cast against assumption of indebtedness, together with a statement of the total number of votes cast in such territory at the last preceding general election.

[ 2022 c 26 s 6; 2015 c 53 s 26; 1996 c 286 s 1; 1973 1st ex.s. c 164 s 8; 1967 c 73 s 11; 1965 ex.s. c 88 s 7; 1965 c 7 s 35.13.090. Prior: 1961 c 282 s 16; prior: 1907 c 245 s 4, part; RRS s 8899, part.]